North Carolina, session 2025, SB860.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-164.14(b) is repealed.
SECTION 2. G.S. 105-164.13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-164.13. Retail sales and use tax.
The sale at retail and the use, storage, or consumption in this State of the following tangible
personal property, digital property, and services are specifically exempted from the tax imposed
by this Article:
…
(13d) Sales of diapers or incontinence underpads on prescription by an enrolled
State Medicaid provider for use by beneficiaries of the State Medicaid
program when the provider is reimbursed by the State Medicaid program or a
Medicaid managed care organization, as defined in 42 U.S.C. §
1396b(m).underpads.
…
(52a) Tangible personal property, digital property, and services for use in carrying
on the work of the following entities, provided the entity is not owned or
controlled by the State:
a. Hospitals not operated for profit, including hospitals and medical
accommodations operated by an authority or other public hospital
described in Article 2 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes.
b. An organization that is exempt from income tax under section
501(c)(3) of the Code and not classified in the National Taxonomy of
Exempt Entities major group areas of (i) Community Improvement
and Capacity Building, (ii) Public and Societal Benefit, or (iii) Mutual
and Membership Benefit.
c. Volunteer fire departments and volunteer emergency medical services
squads that are (i) exempt from income tax under the Code, (ii)
financially accountable to a city, as defined in G.S. 160A-1, a county,
or a group of cities and counties, or (iii) both.
*S860-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. An organization that is a single member LLC that is disregarded for
income tax purposes and satisfies all of the following conditions:
1. The owner of the LLC is an organization that is exempt from
income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the Code.
2. The LLC is a nonprofit entity that would be eligible for an
exemption under section 501(c)(3) of the Code if it were not
disregarded for income tax purposes.
3. The LLC is not an organization that would be properly
classified in any of the major group areas of the National
Taxonomy of Exempt Entities listed in sub-subdivision b. of
this subdivision.
e. Qualified retirement facilities whose property is excluded from
property tax under G.S. 105-278.6A.
f. A university-affiliated nonprofit organization that procures, designs,
constructs, or provides facilities to, or for use by, a constituent
institution of The University of North Carolina. For purposes of this
sub-subdivision, a nonprofit organization includes an entity exempt
from taxation as a disregarded entity of the nonprofit organization.
g. Over-the-counter drugs purchased for use in carrying out the work of
a hospital not listed in one of the sub-subdivisions of this subdivision.
The exemption provided in this subdivision includes indirect sales to a
nonprofit entity of digital property and tangible personal property purchased
by a real property contractor that becomes a part of or permanently installed
or applied to any building or structure that is owned or leased by the nonprofit
entity and is being erected, altered, or repaired for use by the nonprofit entity
for carrying on its nonprofit activities. A sale to fulfill a real property contract
with an entity that holds an exemption certificate is exempt to the same extent
as if purchased directly by the entity that holds the exemption certificate. A
real property contractor that purchases an item allowed an exemption under
this subdivision must provide (i) an exemption certificate to the retailer that
includes the name of the nonprofit entity holding the exemption certificate,
(ii) the exemption certificate number issued to that holder, and (iii) the
information required pursuant to G.S. 105-164.28.
The exemption provided in this subdivision does not apply to (i) purchases
of electricity, telecommunications service, ancillary service, piped natural gas,
video programming, a prepaid meal plan, aviation gasoline and jet fuel, and
spirituous liquor or (ii) sales and use tax liability indirectly paid by a nonprofit
entity through reimbursement to an authorized person of the entity for tax
incurred by the person on an item or transaction subject to tax under Article 5
of this Chapter.
The aggregate annual exemption amount allowed to an entity under this
subdivision for a fiscal year may not exceed thirty-one million seven hundred
thousand dollars ($31,700,000) in tax. A real property contractor who pays
local sales and use taxes on property qualifying for an exemption under this
subdivision on behalf of an entity shall give the entity for whose project the
property was purchased a signed statement containing (i) the date the property
was purchased, (ii) the type of property purchased, (iii) the project for which
the property was used, (iv) if the property was purchased in this State, the
county in which it was purchased, and (v) if the property was not purchased
in this State, the county in which the property was used. If the property was
Page 2 Senate Bill 860-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
purchased in this State, the real property contractor shall attach a copy of the
sales or purchase receipt to the statement.
…."
SECTION 3. Article 5 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 105-164.29C. Nonprofit entity exemption process.
(a) Application. – To be eligible for the exemption provided in G.S. 105-164.13(52a), a
nonprofit entity must obtain from the Department a sales tax exemption number. The application
for exemption must be in the form required by the Secretary, be signed by a person with authority
to bind the entity, and contain any information required by the Secretary. The Secretary must
assign a sales tax exemption number to a nonprofit entity that submits a proper application.
(b) Liability. – A nonprofit entity that does not use the items purchased with its exemption
number must pay the tax that should have been paid on the items purchased, plus interest
calculated from the date the tax would otherwise have been paid."
SECTION 4. G.S. 105-467(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Exemptions and Refunds. – The State exemptions and exclusions contained in Article
5 of Subchapter I of this Chapter, except for the exemption for food in G.S. 105-164.13B, apply
to the local sales and use tax authorized to be levied and imposed under this Article. The State
refund provisions contained in G.S. 105-164.14 and G.S. 105-164.14A apply to the local sales
and use tax authorized to be levied and imposed under this Article. A refund of an excessive or
erroneous State sales tax collection allowed under G.S. 105-164.11 and a refund of State sales
tax paid on a rescinded sale or cancelled service contract under G.S. 105-164.11A apply to the
local sales and use tax authorized to be levied and imposed under this Article. The aggregate
annual local refund exemption amount allowed an entity under G.S. 105-164.14(b)
G.S. 105-164.13(52a) for the State's fiscal year may not exceed thirteen million three hundred
thousand dollars ($13,300,000).
Except as provided in this subsection, a taxing county may not allow an exemption, exclusion,
or refund that is not allowed under the State sales and use tax. A local school administrative unit
and a joint agency created by interlocal agreement among local school administrative units
pursuant to G.S. 160A-462 to jointly purchase food service-related materials, supplies, and
equipment on their behalf is allowed an annual refund of sales and use taxes paid by it under this
Article on direct purchases of tangible personal property and services. Sales and use tax liability
indirectly incurred by the entity as part of a real property contract for real property that is owned
or leased by the entity and is a capital improvement for use by the entity is considered a sales or
use tax liability incurred on direct purchases by the entity for the purpose of this subsection. The
refund allowed under this subsection does not apply to purchases of electricity,
telecommunications service, ancillary service, piped natural gas, video programming, or a
prepaid meal plan. A request for a refund is due in the same time and manner as provided in
G.S. 105-164.14(c). Refunds applied for more than three years after the due date are barred."
SECTION 5. G.S. 105-236(a)(5a) reads as rewritten:
"(5a) Misuse of Exemption Certificate or Affidavit of Capital Improvement. – For
misuse of an exemption certificate or affidavit of capital improvement by a
purchaser, the Secretary shall assess a penalty equal to two hundred fifty
dollars ($250.00). An exemption certificate is a certificate issued by the
Secretary that authorizes a retailer to sell an item to the holder of the certificate
and either collect tax at a preferential rate or not collect tax on the sale.
Examples of an exemption certificate include a certificate of exemption, a
direct pay certificate, and a conditional exemption certificate. Misuse under
this subdivision includes improper use of a certificate of exemption issued to
a nonprofit entity pursuant to G.S. 105-164.29C for direct and indirect
purchases by the entity or another person. An affidavit of capital improvement
Senate Bill 860-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
substantiates that a contract, or a portion of work to be performed to fulfill a
contract, is to be taxed for sales and use tax purposes as a real property
contract."
SECTION 6. G.S. 105-164.4G(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) Exceptions. – The tax imposed by this section does not apply to the following:
…
(2) Tuition, registration fees, or charges to attend instructional seminars,
conferences, or workshops for educational purposes, notwithstanding that
entertainment activity may be offered as an ancillary purpose of an event listed
in this subdivision.
(2a) Events held by a nonprofit entity exempt from tax under Article 4 of this
Chapter solely for fundraising purposes for the entity, notwithstanding that
entertainment activity may be offered as an ancillary purpose of the event.
…."
SECTION 7. G.S. 105-278.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-278.6. Real and personal property used for charitable purposes.
(a) Use. – Real and personal property owned by:by an entity not organized or operated
for profit and listed in this section is exempt from taxation if (i) as to real property, it is actually
and exclusively occupied and used by the owner for charitable purposes and (ii) as to personal
property, it is entirely and completely used by the owner for charitable purposes.
(1) A Young Men's Christian Association or similar organization;organization.
(2) A home for the aged, sick, or infirm;infirm.
(3) An orphanage or similar home;home.
(4) A Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals;Animals.
(5) A reformatory or correctional institution;institution.
(6) A monastery, convent, or nunnery;nunnery.
(7) A nonprofit, life-saving, first aid, or rescue squad organization;organization.
(8) A nonprofit An organization providing housing for for, or respite care for,
individuals or families with low or moderate incomesincomes.
shall be exempted from taxation if: (i) As to real property, it is actually and exclusively occupied
and used, and as to personal property, it is entirely and completely used, by the owner for
charitable purposes; and (ii) the owner is not organized or operated for profit.
(b) Purpose. – A charitable purpose within the meaning of this section is one that has
humane and philanthropic objectives; it is an activity that benefits humanity or a significant rather
than limited segment of the community without expectation of pecuniary profit or reward. The
humane treatment of animals is also a charitable purpose.
(c) Incidental Patronage. – The fact that a building or facility is incidentally available to
and patronized by the general public, so long as there is no material amount of business or
patronage with the general public, shall not defeat the exemption granted by this section.
(d) Partial Use. – Notwithstanding the exclusive-use requirements of this section, if part
of a property that otherwise meets the section's requirements is used for a purpose that would
require exemption under subsection (a), above, if the entire property were so used, the valuation
of the part so used shall be exempted from taxation.
(e) Housing Exceptions. – Real property held by an organization described in subdivision
(a)(8) for a charitable purpose under this section qualifies for the benefit provided by this section
if one of the following is true:
(1) It is held as a future site for housing for individuals or families with low or
moderate incomes incomes. Real property may be classified under this section
subdivision for no more than 10 years. The taxes that would otherwise be due
on real property exempt under this subsection subdivision shall be a lien on
the property as provided in G.S. 105-355(a). The taxes shall be carried
Page 4 Senate Bill 860-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
forward in the records of the taxing unit as deferred taxes. The deferred taxes
are due and payable in accordance with G.S. 105-277.1F when the property
loses its eligibility for deferral as a result of a disqualifying event. A
disqualifying event occurs when the property was not used for low- or
moderate-income housing within 10 years from the first day of the fiscal year
the property was classified under this subsection. subdivision. In addition to
the provisions in G.S. 105-277.1F, all liens arising under this subdivision are
extinguished when the property is used for low- or moderate-income housing
within the time period allowed under this subsection.subdivision.
(2) The real property is leased, rather than owned, by the organization as a tenant
with the organization or owner providing a copy of the lease agreement and
certifying that the lease agreement requires the organization to use the real
property for housing that would otherwise qualify under this section if the
organization owned the real property."
SECTION 8. Sections 1 through 5 of this act become effective October 1, 2026, and
apply to sales and purchases made on or after that date. Section 6 of this act becomes effective
July 1, 2026, and applies to admission charges for entertainment activities held on or after that
date. Section 7 of this act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after
July 1, 2026. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law. This act does not affect
the rights or liabilities of the State, a taxpayer, or another person arising under a statute amended
or repealed by this act before the effective date of its amendment or repeal, nor does it affect the
right to any refund or credit of a tax that accrued under the amended or repealed statute before
the effective date of its amendment or repeal.
Senate Bill 860-First Edition Page 5